Tennessee, session 114, HB1783.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 37-1-149(b), is amended by deleting
subdivision (2) and substituting:
(2) A court may order or direct a court-appointed special advocate to conduct an
investigation and make reports and recommendations pertaining to the welfare of a child
as follows:
(A) The sole purpose of appointing a court-appointed special advocate is
to provide an additional, but independent, source of factual information to the
judge and other parties and thus providing the most comprehensive, accurate,
complete, and timely information for a judicial officer to consider in making initial,
intermediate, or final decisions as to the placement, custody, and future of a child
and family involved;
(B) Upon request of the court-appointed special advocate, the
department shall provide full, accurate, complete, unrestricted, and unredacted
access to originals or copies of all current and historical information in the
department's possession, whether authored by the department or another
source, regarding the child, parents, or other person or organization identified by
the court-appointed special advocate as having information pertinent or with
personal relevance to the investigation within ten (10) business days of the
request being made;
HB1783
011518
- 1 -

(C) A department, administrative agency, school, clerk of the court,
organization, or law enforcement agency of this state shall provide full, accurate,
complete, unrestricted, and unredacted access to originals or copies of all
information it possesses regarding the child, parents, or other persons or
organizations identified by the court-appointed special advocate as having
information about or being pertinent to the instant case within ten (10) business
days of the request being made. Information held by any law enforcement
agency with regard to a current, active, or ongoing criminal investigation is
exempted from the requirements in this subdivision (b)(2)(C); and
(D) Unless an attorney is assigned or engaged to assist or represent the
court-appointed special advocate, the court supervising the case shall create an
active mechanism through which the court-appointed special advocate may
obtain process for records or testimony not obtainable by other means.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 011518